src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
gjøgnumganga:gjøgnum#g s51 ;
pástanda:pá#st s65 ;
uppstanda:upp#st s65 ;
fyriganga:fyri#g s51 ;
behalda:be# s61 ;
fasthalda:fast# s61 ;
viðlíkahalda:við#líka# s61 ;
útlata:út#lat s64 ;
halda: s61 ;
yvirhalda:yvir# s61 ;
fyrihalda:fyri# s61 ;
innihalda:inni# s61 ;
uppihalda:uppi# s61 ;
gøllhalda:gøll# s61 ;
reinhalda:rein# s61 ;
hátíðarhalda:hátíðar# s61 ;
undirhalda:undir# s61 ;
mishalda:mis# s61 ;
minnishalda:minnis# s61 ;
tvíhalda:tví# s61 ;
veðhalda:veð# s61 ;
neyðhalda:neyð# s61 ;
standa:st s65 ;
undirstanda:undir#st s65 ;
forstanda:for#st s65 ;
útstanda:út#st s65 ;
draga:dr s67 ;
magadraga:maga#dr s67 ;
lagdraga:lag#dr s67 ;
tráðdraga:tráð#dr s67 ;
ganga:g s51 ;
framganga:fram#g s51 ;
helganga:hel#g s51 ;
kollganga:koll#g s51 ;
innganga:inn#g s51 ;
kappganga:kapp#g s51 ;
forganga:for#g s51 ;
viðurganga:viður#g s51 ;
ovganga:ov#g s51 ;
tráganga:trá#g s51 ;
íganga:í#g s51 ;
fríganga:frí#g s51 ;
viðganga:við#g s51 ;
hanga:h s51 ;
sitja:sitj s57 ;
biðja:bið s66 ;
umbiðja:um#bið s66 ;
tilbiðja:til#bið s66 ;
bølbiðja:bøl#bið s66 ;
trábiðja:trá#bið s66 ;
taka:tak s60 ;
bandtaka:bandtak s60 ;
handtaka:handtak s60 ;
hundtaka:hundtak s60 ;
bergtaka:bergtak s60 ;
hugtaka:hugtak s60 ;
heltaka:heltak s60 ;
trølltaka:trølltak s60 ;
ognartaka:ognartak s60 ;
tjóðartaka:tjóðartak s60 ;
upptaka:upp#tak s60 ;
endurtaka:endurtak s60 ;
ljóstaka:ljós#tak s60 ;
luttaka:lut#tak s60 ;
móttaka:mót#tak s60 ;
ovtaka:ov#tak s60 ;
tvítaka:tví#tak s60 ;
orðtaka:orð#tak s60 ;
góðtaka:góð#tak s60 ;
leka:lek s56 ;
reka:rek s56 ;
speireka:speirek s56 ;
naglreka:naglrek s56 ;
várreka:várrek s56 ;
spottreka:spottrek s56 ;
røkka:røkk s50 ;
søkka:søkk s50 ;
steinsøkka:steinsøkk s50 ;
støkka:støkk s50 ;
hvøkka:hvøkk s50 ;
ala:al s58 ;
gala:gal s58 ;
stjala:st s59 ;
mergstjala:merg#st s59 ;
magnstjala:magn#st s59 ;
ørstjala:ør#st s59 ;
smástjala:smá#st s59 ;
mala:mal s58 ;
kringlumala:kringlumal s58 ;
svølla:svøll s50 ;
koma:kom s63 ;
viðkoma:við#kom s63 ;
fullkoma:full#kom s63 ;
umkoma:um#kom s63 ;
útkoma:út#kom s63 ;
forkoma:for#kom s63 ;
sokna:sokn s50 ;
drepa:drep s56 ;
steindrepa:steindrep s56 ;
hálvdrepa:hálvdrep s56 ;
oyðdrepa:oyðdrep s56 ;
gleppa:glepp s49_3 ;
sleppa:slepp s49_3 ;
verpa:verp s49_4 ;
leypa: s53 ;
skammleypa:skamm s53 ;
sporleypa:spor s53 ;
stórleypa:stór s53 ;
stáleypa:stá s53 ;
tvíleypa:tví s53 ;
orðleypa:orð s53 ;
sporðleypa:sporð s53 ;
stóðleypa:stóð s53 ;
støleypa:stø s53 ;
fara:far s55 ;
endafara:endafar s55 ;
geislafara:geislafar s55 ;
handfara:handfar s55 ;
hundfara:hundfar s55 ;
hugfara:hugfar s55 ;
eygfara:eygfar s55 ;
málfara:málfar s55 ;
skammfara:skammfar s55 ;
granskufara:granskufar s55 ;
ovfara:ov#far s55 ;
bera:ber s54 ;
moldbera:moldber s54 ;
handbera:handber s54 ;
eygbera:eygber s54 ;
málbera:málber s54 ;
sambera:samber s54 ;
umbera:umber s54 ;
samanbera:samanber s54 ;
munnbera:munnber s54 ;
jarnbera:jarnber s54 ;
vatnbera:vatnber s54 ;
kappbera:kappber s54 ;
tvørbera:tvørber s54 ;
skriftbera:skriftber s54 ;
knívbera:knívber s54 ;
tøðbera:tøðber s54 ;
uggaskera:uggasker s54 ;
kílaskera:kílasker s54 ;
umskera:umsker s54 ;
ráskera:rásker s54 ;
trískera:trísker s54 ;
lesa:les s56 ;
avlesa:av#les s56 ;
skáklesa:skák#les s56 ;
mislesa:mis#les s56 ;
rættlesa:rætt#les s56 ;
lata:lat s64 ;
sita:sit s57 ;
umsita:umsit s57 ;
nerta:nert s49_4 ;
láta:lát s64_1 ;
fyriláta:fyri#lát s64_1 ;
forláta:for#lát s64_1 ;
avláta:av#lát s64_1 ;
grava:grav s60 ;
gosgrava:gos#grav s60 ;
geva:gev s56 ;
frígeva:frí#gev s56 ;
ráðgeva:ráð#gev s56 ;
lóggeva:lóg#gev s56 ;
tilgeva:til#gev s56 ;
formgeva:form#gev s56 ;
yvirgeva:yvir#gev s56 ;
sniðgeva:snið#gev s56 ;
veva:vev s52 ;
skelva:skelv s49_4 ;
sova: s62 ;
steinsova:stein s62 ;
forsova:for# s62 ;
hálvsova:hálv s62 ;
ovsova:ov# s62 ;
hvørva+v1:h s68 ;
sjálvhvørva:sjálv#h s68 ;
bráðhvørva:bráð#h s68 ;
sláa:slá s69 ;
svímasláa:svíma#slá s69 ;
lamsláa:lam#slá s69 ;
kappsláa:kapp#slá s69 ;
kjaftsláa:kjaft#slá s69 ;
kantsláa:kant#slá s69 ;
jarðsláa:jarð#slá s69 ;
aka:ak s60 ;
gita:git s57 ;
hugnema:hugnem s49_4 ;
hugnema:hugnem s52 ;
nema:nem s49_4 ;
nema:nem s52 ;
bresta:brest s49_4 ;
avhanga:avh s51 ;
innibera:inni#ber s54 ;
uppdraga:upp#dr s67 ;
